Utah statutes.
17C-1-103.   Limitations on applicability of title -- Amendment of
previously adopted project area plan.
(1)  Nothing in this title may be construed to:
(a)  impose a requirement or obligation on an agency, with respect to a
project area plan adopted or an agency action taken, that was not imposed by
the law in effect at the time the project area plan was adopted or the action
taken;
(b)  prohibit an agency from taking an action that:
(i)  was allowed by the law in effect immediately before an applicable
amendment to this title;
(ii)  is permitted or required under the project area plan adopted before the
amendment; and
(iii)  is not explicitly prohibited under this title;
(c)  revive any right to challenge any action of the agency that had already
expired; or
(d)  require a project area plan to contain a provision that was not required
by the law in effect at the time the project area plan was adopted.
(2) (a)  A project area plan adopted before an amendment to this title becomes
effective may be amended as provided in this title.
(b)  Unless explicitly prohibited by this title, an amendment under Subsection
(2)(a) may include a provision that is allowed under this title but that was
not required or allowed by the law in effect before the applicable amendment.
